Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.130

Obscene literature—Description.

An indictment or information for exhibiting, publishing, passing, selling, or offering to sell, or having in possession with such intent, any lewd or obscene book, pamphlet, picture, print, card, paper, or writing, need not set forth any portion of the language used or figures shown upon such book, pamphlet, picture, print, card, paper, or writing, but it is sufficient to state generally the fact of the lewdness or obscenity thereof.

[ 1891 c 28 s 39; Code 1881 s 1024; RRS s 2075.]

NOTES:

Obscenity: Chapter 9.68 RCW.